North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 7A. Registration of Voters.
§ 163-82.6.
Acceptance of application forms.

How the Form May Be Submitted. — The county board of elections shall accept any form described in

G.S. 163-82.3

if the applicant submits the form by mail, facsimile transmission, transmission of a scanned document, or in person. The applicant may delegate the submission of the form to another person. Any person who communicates
to an applicant acceptance of that delegation shall deliver that form so that it is received by the appropriate county board of elections in time to satisfy the registration deadline in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (d)
of this section for the next election. It shall be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to communicate to the applicant acceptance of that delegation and then fail to make a good faith effort to deliver the form so that it is received
by the county board of elections in time to satisfy the registration deadline in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (d) of this section for the next election. It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of failing to make
a good faith effort to deliver a delegated form by the registration deadline that the delegatee informed the applicant that the form would not likely be delivered in time for the applicant to vote in the next election. It shall
be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to sell or attempt to sell a completed voter registration form or to condition its delivery upon payment.

Misdemeanors. — It shall be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to do any of the following:

To communicate to the applicant acceptance of the delegation described in subsection (a) of this section and then fail to make a good faith effort to deliver the form so that it is received by the county board of elections in time to satisfy the registration
deadline in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (d) of this section for the next election. It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of failing to make a good faith effort to deliver a delegated form by the registration
deadline that the delegatee informed the applicant that the form would not likely be delivered in time for the applicant to vote in the next election.

To sell or attempt to sell a completed voter registration form or to condition its delivery upon payment.

To change a person’s information on a voter registration form prior to its delivery to a county board of elections.

To coerce a person into marking a party affiliation other than the party affiliation the person desires.

To offer a person a voter registration form that has a party affiliation premarked unless the person receiving the form has requested the premarking.

Signature. — The form shall be valid only if signed by the applicant. An electronically captured signature, including signatures on applications generated by computer programs of third-party groups, shall not be valid on a voter registration form, except
as provided in Article 21A of this Chapter. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, an electronically captured image of the signature of a voter on an electronic voter registration form offered by a State agency shall
be considered a valid signature for all purposes for which a signature on a paper voter registration form is used.

Registration Deadlines for a Primary or Election. — In order to be valid for a primary or election, the form:

If submitted by mail, must be postmarked at least 25 days before the primary or election, except that any mailed application on which the postmark is missing or unclear is validly submitted if received in the mail not later than 20 days before the primary
or election,

If submitted in person, by facsimile transmission, or by transmission of a scanned document, must be received by the county board of elections by a time established by that board, but no earlier than 5:00 P.M., on the twenty-fifth day before the primary
or election,

If submitted through a delegatee who violates the duty set forth in subsection (a) of this section, must be signed by the applicant and given to the delegatee not later than 25 days before the primary or election, except as provided in subsection (f)
of this section.

If the application is submitted by facsimile transmission or transmission of a scanned document, a permanent copy of the completed, signed form shall be delivered to the county board no later than 20 days before the election.

(Effective until March 9, 2022) Instances When Person May Register and Vote on Primary or Election Day. — If a person has become qualified to register and vote between the twenty-fifth day before a primary or election and primary or election day, then
that person may apply to register on primary or election day by submitting an application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b) to:

A member of the county board of elections;

The county director of elections; or

The chief judge or a judge of the precinct in which the person is eligible to vote, and, if the application is approved, that person may vote the same day. The official in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection to whom the application is submitted
shall decide whether the applicant is eligible to vote. The applicant shall present to the official written or documentary evidence that the applicant is the person he represents himself to be. The official, if in doubt
as to the right of the applicant to register, may require other evidence satisfactory to that official as to the applicant’s qualifications. If the official determines that the person is eligible, the person shall be permitted
to vote in the primary or election and the county board shall add the person’s name to the list of registered voters. If the official denies the application, the person shall be permitted to vote a challenged ballot under
the provisions of

G.S. 163-88.1

, and may appeal the denial to the full county board of elections. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the county boards of elections to follow in hearing appeals for denial of primary
or election day applications to register. No person shall be permitted to register on the day of a second primary unless he shall have become qualified to register and vote between the date of the first primary and the
date of the succeeding second primary.

(f) (Effective March 9, 2022 until June 1, 2022) Instances When Person May Register and Vote on Primary or Election Day. — If a person has become qualified to register and vote between the twenty-fifth day before a primary or election and primary or election
day, then that person may apply to register on primary or election day by submitting an application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b) to:

(1) A member of the county board of elections;

(2) The county director of elections; or

(3)

The chief judge or a judge of the precinct in which the person is eligible to vote,

and, if the application is approved, that person may vote the same day. The official in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection to whom the application is submitted shall decide whether the applicant is eligible to vote. The applicant shall present
to the official written or documentary evidence that the applicant is the person he represents himself to be. The official, if in doubt as to the right of the applicant to register, may require other evidence satisfactory
to that official as to the applicant’s qualifications. If the official determines that the person is eligible, the person shall be permitted to vote in the primary or election and the county board shall add the person’s
name to the list of registered voters. If the official denies the application, the person shall be permitted to vote a challenged ballot under the provisions of

G.S. 163-88.1

, and may appeal the denial to the full county board of elections. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the county boards of elections to follow in hearing appeals for denial of
primary or election day applications to register.

(f) (Effective June 1, 2022) Instances When Person May Register and Vote on Primary or Election Day. — If a person has become qualified to register and vote between the twenty-fifth day before a primary or election and primary or election day, then that
person may apply to register on primary or election day by submitting an application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b) to:

(1) A member of the county board of elections;

(2)
The county director of elections; or

(3)
The chief judge or a judge of the precinct in which the person is eligible to vote,

and, if the application is approved, that person may vote the same day. The official in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection to whom the application is submitted shall decide whether the applicant is eligible to vote. The applicant shall present
to the official written or documentary evidence that the applicant is the person he represents himself to be. The official, if in doubt as to the right of the applicant to register, may require other evidence satisfactory
to that official as to the applicant’s qualifications. If the official determines that the person is eligible, the person shall be permitted to vote in the primary or election and the county board shall add the person’s
name to the list of registered voters. If the official denies the application, the person shall be permitted to vote a challenged ballot under the provisions of G.S. 163-88.1, and may appeal the denial to the full county
board of elections. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the county boards of elections to follow in hearing appeals for denial of primary or election day applications to register. No person shall
be permitted to register on the day of a second primary unless he shall have become qualified to register and vote between the date of the first primary and the date of the succeeding second primary.

For purposes of subsection (f) of this section, persons who “become qualified to register and vote” during a time period:

Include those who during that time period are naturalized as citizens of the United States or who are restored to citizenship after a conviction of a felony; but

Do not include persons who reach the age of 18 during that time period, if those persons were eligible to register while 17 years old during an earlier period.

The county board of elections shall forward by electronic means any application submitted for the purpose of preregistration to the State Board of Elections. No later than 60 days prior to the first election in which the applicant will be legally entitled
to vote, the State Board of Elections shall notify the appropriate county board of elections to verify the qualifications and address of the applicant in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.7

.

History.
1901, c. 89, ss. 18, 21; Rev., ss. 4322, 4323; C.S., ss. 5946, 5947; 1923, c. 111, s. 3; 1933, c. 165, s. 5; 1947, c. 475; 1953, c. 843; 1955, c. 800; 1957, c. 784, ss., 3, 4; 1961, c. 382; 1963, c. 303, ss. 1, 2; 1967,
c. 761, s. 3; c. 775, s. 1; 1969, c. 750, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 626, s. 1; 1979, c. 539, s. 5; c. 766, s., 2; 1981, c. 33, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1265, s. 6; 1983, c. 553; 1985, c. 260, s. 1; 1991, c. 363, s. 1; 1991 (Reg.
Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 18(a); 1993, c. 74, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-426, s. 1(a), (b); 2001-315, s. 1; 2001-319, s. 6(a); 2003-226,
s. 4; 2004-127, s. 9(a); 2007-253, s. 2; 2007-391, s. 16(a); 2008-150, s. 5(d), (e); 2009-541, s. 10(a); 2013-381, ss. 13.1, 16.3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2021-56, s. 1.5(b).

Subsection (f) Set Out Three Times.

The first version of subsection (f) set out above is effective until March 9, 2022. The second version of subsection (f) set out above is effective March 9, 2022 until June 1, 2022. The third version of subsection (f) set out above is effective June 1,
2022.

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.6. Acceptance of application forms

How the Form May Be Submitted. — The county board of elections shall accept any form described in

G.S. 163-82.3

if the applicant submits the form by mail, facsimile transmission, transmission of a scanned document, or in person. The applicant may delegate the submission of the form to another person. Any person who communicates
to an applicant acceptance of that delegation shall deliver that form so that it is received by the appropriate county board of elections in time to satisfy the registration deadline in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (c)
of this section for the next election. It shall be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to communicate to the applicant acceptance of that delegation and then fail to make a good faith effort to deliver the form so that it is received
by the county board of elections in time to satisfy the registration deadline in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (c) of this section for the next election. It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of failing to make
a good faith effort to deliver a delegated form by the registration deadline that the delegatee informed the applicant that the form would not likely be delivered in time for the applicant to vote in the next election. It shall
be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to sell or attempt to sell a completed voter registration form or to condition its delivery upon payment.

To communicate to the applicant acceptance of the delegation described in subsection (a) of this section and then fail to make a good faith effort to deliver the form so that it is received by the county board of elections in time to satisfy the registration
deadline in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (c) of this section for the next election. It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of failing to make a good faith effort to deliver a delegated form by the registration
deadline that the delegatee informed the applicant that the form would not likely be delivered in time for the applicant to vote in the next election.

To sell or attempt to sell a completed voter registration form or to condition its delivery upon payment.

To change a person’s information on a voter registration form prior to its delivery to a county board of elections

To coerce a person into marking a party affiliation other than the party affiliation the person desires.

To offer a person a voter registration form that has a party affiliation premarked unless the person receiving the form has requested the premarking.

Signature. — The form shall be valid only if signed by the applicant. An electronically captured signature, including signatures on applications generated by computer programs of third-party groups, shall not be valid on a voter registration form, except
as provided in Article 21A of this Chapter. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, an electronically captured image of the signature of a voter on an electronic voter registration form offered by a State agency shall
be considered a valid signature for all purposes for which a signature on a paper voter registration form is used.

Registration Deadlines for a Primary or Election. — In order to be valid for a primary or election, except as provided in

G.S. 163-82.6

A, the form:

If submitted by mail, must be postmarked at least 25 days before the primary or election, except that any mailed application on which the postmark is missing or unclear is validly submitted if received in the mail not later than 20 days before the primary
or election,

If submitted in person, by facsimile transmission, or by transmission of a scanned document, must be received by the county board of elections by a time established by that board, but no earlier than 5:00 P.M., on the twenty-fifth day before the primary
or election,

If submitted through a delegatee who violates the duty set forth in subsection (a) of this section, must be signed by the applicant and given to the delegatee not later than 25 days before the primary or election, except as provided in subsection (d)
of this section.

Instances When Person May Register and Vote on Primary or Election Day. — If a person has become qualified to register and vote between the twenty-fifth day before a primary or election and primary or election day, then that person may apply to register
on primary or election day by submitting an application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b) to:

A member of the county board of elections;

The county director of elections; or

The chief judge or a judge of the precinct in which the person is eligible to vote,

For purposes of subsection (d) of this section, persons who “become qualified to register and vote” during a time period:

Include those who during that time period are naturalized as citizens of the United States or who are restored to citizenship after a conviction of a felony; but

Do not include persons who reach the age of 18 during that time period, if those persons were eligible to register while 17 years old during an earlier period.

The county board of elections shall forward by electronic means any application submitted for the purpose of preregistration to the State Board of Elections. No later than 60 days prior to the first election in which the applicant will be legally entitled
to vote, the State Board of Elections shall notify the appropriate county board of elections to verify the qualifications and address of the applicant in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.7

.

(a1) Misdemeanors. — It shall be a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person to do any of the following:

(c1) If the application is submitted by facsimile transmission or transmission of a scanned document, a permanent copy of the completed, signed form shall be delivered to the county board no later than 20 days before the election.

and, if the application is approved, that person may vote the same day. The official in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection to whom the application is submitted shall decide whether the applicant is eligible to vote. The applicant shall present
to the official written or documentary evidence that the applicant is the person he represents himself to be. The official, if in doubt as to the right of the applicant to register, may require other evidence satisfactory to that official
as to the applicant’s qualifications. If the official determines that the person is eligible, the person shall be permitted to vote in the primary or election and the county board shall add the person’s name to the list of registered
voters. If the official denies the application, the person shall be permitted to vote a challenged ballot under the provisions of

G.S. 163-88.1

, and may appeal the denial to the full county board of elections. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the county boards of elections to follow in hearing appeals for denial of primary or election
day applications to register. No person shall be permitted to register on the day of a second primary unless he shall have become qualified to register and vote between the date of the first primary and the date of the succeeding second
primary.

§ 163-82.6A.
Address and name changes at one-stop sites.

Change of Registration at One-Stop Voting Site. —
A person who is already registered to vote in the county may update the information in the registration record in accordance with procedures prescribed by the State Board of Elections, but an individual’s party affiliation
may not be changed during the one-stop voting period before any first or second partisan primary in which the individual is eligible to vote.

History.
2007-253, s. 1; 2009-541, s. 11; 2013-381, ss. 16.1, 16.1A; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.6A. In-person registration and voting at one-stop sites.

Who May Register in Person. — In accordance with the provisions in this section, an individual who is qualified to register to vote may register in person and then vote at a one-stop voting site in the person’s county of residence during the period for
one-stop voting provided under

G.S. 163-227.2

. For purposes of this section, a one-stop voting site includes the county board of elections office, if that office is used for one-stop voting.

Both Attestation and Proof of Residence Required. — To register and vote under this section, the person shall do both of the following:

Complete a voter registration form as prescribed in

G.S. 163-82.4

, including the attestation requirement of

G.S. 163-82.4

(b) that the person meets each eligibility requirement. Such attestation is signed under penalty of a Class I felony under G.S. 163-275(13); and

Provide proof of residence by presenting any of the following valid documents that show the person’s current name and current residence address: a North Carolina drivers license, a photo identification from a government agency, or any of the documents
listed in G.S. 163- 166.12(a)(2). The State Board of Elections may designate additional documents or methods that suffice and shall prescribe procedures for establishing proof of residence.

Voting With Retrievable Ballot. — A person who registers under this section shall vote a retrievable absentee ballot as provided in

G.S. 163-227.2

immediately after registering. If a person declines to vote immediately, the registration shall be processed, and the person may later vote at a one-stop voting site under this section in the same election.

Verification of Registration; Counting of Ballot. — Within two business days of the person’s registration under this section, the county board of elections in conjunction with the State Board of Elections shall verify the North Carolina drivers license
or Social Security number in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.12

, update the statewide registration database and search for possible duplicate registrations, and proceed under

G.S. 163-82.7

to verify the person’s address. The person’s vote shall be counted unless the county board determines that the applicant is not qualified to vote in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.

Change of Registration at One-Stop Voting Site. — A person who is already registered to vote in the county may update the information in the registration record in accordance with procedures prescribed by the State Board of Elections, but an individual’s
party affiliation may not be changed during the one-stop voting period before any first or second partisan primary in which the individual is eligible to vote.

Voting in Primary. — Any person who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election for which a partisan or nonpartisan primary is held, even though not so qualified by the date of the primary, may register for the primary and
general election prior to the primary and then vote in the primary and general election after being registered in accordance with the provisions of this section.

§ 163-82.7.
Verification of qualifications and address of applicant; denial or approval of application.

Tentative Determination of Qualification. — When a county board of elections receives an application for registration submitted pursuant to

G.S. 163-82.6

, the board either:

Shall make a determination that the applicant is not qualified to vote at the address given, or

Shall make a tentative determination that the applicant is qualified to vote at the address given, subject to the mail verification notice procedure outlined in subsection (c) of this section within a reasonable time after receiving the application.

Denial of Registration. — If the county board of elections makes a determination pursuant to subsection (a) of this section that the applicant is not qualified to vote at the address given, the board shall send, by certified mail, a notice of denial
of registration. The notice of denial shall contain the date on which registration was denied, and shall be mailed within two business days after denial. The notice of denial shall inform the applicant of alternatives that the
applicant may pursue to exercise the franchise. If the applicant disagrees with the denial, the applicant may appeal the decision under

G.S. 163-82.18

.

Verification of Address by Mail. — If the county board of elections tentatively determines that the applicant is qualified to vote at the address given, then the county board shall send a notice to the applicant, by nonforwardable mail, at the address
the applicant provides on the application form. The notice shall state that the county will register the applicant to vote if the Postal Service does not return the notice as undeliverable to the county board. The notice shall
also inform the applicant of the precinct and voting place to which the applicant will be assigned if registered.

Approval of Application. — If the Postal Service does not return the notice as undeliverable, the county board shall register the applicant to vote.

Second Notice if First Notice Is Returned as Undeliverable. — If the Postal Service returns the notice as undeliverable, the county board shall send a second notice by nonforwardable mail to the same address to which the first was sent. If the second
notice is not returned as undeliverable, the county board shall register the applicant to vote.

Denial of Application Based on Lack of Verification of Address. — If the Postal Service returns as undeliverable the notice sent by nonforwardable mail pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, the county board shall deny the application. The county
board need not try to notify the applicant further.

Voting When Verification Process Is Incomplete. — In cases where an election occurs before the process of verification outlined in this section has had time to be completed, the county board of elections shall be guided by the following rules:

If the county board has made a tentative determination that an applicant is qualified to vote under subsection (a) of this section, then that person shall not be denied the right to vote in person in an election unless the Postal Service has returned
as undeliverable two notices to the applicant: one mailed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and one mailed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section. This subdivision does not preclude a challenge to the voter’s
qualifications under Article 8 of this Chapter.

If the Postal Service has returned as undeliverable a notice sent within 25 days before the election to the applicant under subsection (c) of this section, then the applicant may vote only in person in that first election and may not vote by absentee
ballot except in person under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6. The county board of elections shall establish a procedure at the voting site for:

Obtaining the correct address of any person described in this subdivision who appears to vote in person; and

Assuring that the person votes in the proper place and in the proper contests. If a notice mailed under subsection (c) or subsection (e) of this section is returned as undeliverable after a person has already voted by absentee ballot, then that person’s
ballot may be challenged in accordance with

G.S. 163-89

.

If a notice sent pursuant to subsection (c) or (e) of this section is returned by the Postal Service as undeliverable after a person has already voted in an election, then the county board shall treat the person as a registered voter but shall send a
confirmation mailing pursuant to G.S. 163-82.14(d)(2) and remove or retain the person on the registration records in accordance with that subdivision.

History.
1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 18(a); 1993, c. 74, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1999-455, s. 16; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(a); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.7A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(a), effective December 19, 2018.

History.
2013-381, s. 2.3; 2017-6, s. 3; repealed by 2018-144, s. 3.1(a), effective December 19, 2018.

§ 163-82.8.
Voter registration cards.

Authority to Issue Card. — With the approval of the board of county commissioners, the county board of elections may issue to each voter in the county a voter registration card, or may issue cards to all voters registered after January 1, 1995.

Content and Format of Card. — At a minimum, the voter registration card shall:

List the voter’s name, address, and voting place;

Contain the address and telephone number of the county board of elections, along with blanks to report a change of address within the county, change of name, and change of party affiliation; and

Be wallet size.No voter registration card may be issued by a county board of elections unless the State Board has approved the format of the card.

Ways County Board and Registrant May Use Card. — If the county board of elections issues voter registration cards, the county board may use that card as a notice of tentative approval of the voter’s application pursuant to G.S. 163-82.7(c), provided
that the mailing contains the statements and information required in that subsection. The county board may also satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 163-82.15

(b), 163-82.16(b), or 163-82.17(b) by sending the registrant a replacement of the voter registration card to verify change of address, change of name, or change of party affiliation. A registrant may use the card
to report a change of address, change of name, or change of party affiliation, satisfying

G.S. 163-82.15

, 163-82.16, or 163-82.17.

Card as Evidence of Registration. — A voter registration card shall be evidence of registration but shall not preclude a challenge as permitted by law.

Display of Card May Not Be Required to Vote. — No county board of elections may require that a voter registration card be displayed in order to vote.

History.
1901, c. 89, ss. 18, 21; Rev., ss. 4322, 4323; C.S., ss. 5946, 5947; 1923, c. 111, s. 3; 1933, c. 165, s. 5; 1947, c. 475; 1953, c. 843; 1955, c. 800; 1957, c. 784, ss. 3, 4; 1961, c. 382; 1963, c. 303, ss. 1, 2; 1967, c.
761, s. 3; c. 775, s. 1; 1969, c. 750, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 626, s. 1; 1979, c. 539, s. 5; c. 766, s. 2; 1981, c. 33, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1265, s. 6; 1983, c. 553; 1985, c. 260, s. 1; 1991, c. 363, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess.,
1992), c. 1032, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2015-103, s. 8(f); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.1(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.8. Voter registration cards.

Authority to Issue Card. — With the approval of the board of county commissioners, the county board of elections may issue to each voter in the county a voter registration card, or may issue cards to all voters registered after January 1, 1995.

Content and Format of Card. — At a minimum, the voter registration card shall:

List the voter’s name, address, and voting place;

Contain the address and telephone number of the county board of elections, along with blanks to report a change of address within the county, change of name, and change of party affiliation; and

Be wallet size. No voter registration card may be issued by a county board of elections unless the State Board of Elections has approved the format of the card.

Ways County Board and Registrant May Use Card. — If the county board of elections issues voter registration cards, the county board may use that card as a notice of tentative approval of the voter’s application pursuant to G.S. 163-82.7(c), provided
that the mailing contains the statements and information required in that subsection. The county board may also satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 163-82.15

(b), 163-82.16(b), or 163-82.17(b) by sending the registrant a replacement of the voter registration card to verify change of address, change of name, or change of party affiliation. A registrant may use the card
to report a change of address, change of name, or change of party affiliation, satisfying

G.S. 163-82.15

, 163-82.16, or 163-82.17.

Card as Evidence of Registration. — A voter registration card shall be evidence of registration but shall not preclude a challenge as permitted by law.

Display of Card May Not Be Required to Vote. — No county board of elections may require that a voter registration card be displayed in order to vote.

§ 163-82.8A.
Voter photo identification cards.

The county board of elections shall, in accordance with this section, issue without charge voter photo identification cards upon request to registered voters. The voter photo identification cards shall contain a photograph of the registered voter, the
name of the registered voter, and the voter registration number for that registered voter. The voter photo identification card shall be used for voting purposes only and shall expire 10 years from the date of issuance. The expiration
of a voter photo identification card shall not create a presumption that the voter’s voter registration has expired or become inactive, and a voter’s voter registration shall not be rendered inactive solely due to the expiration
of the voter photo identification card.

The State Board shall make available to county boards of elections the equipment necessary to print voter photo identification cards. County boards of elections shall operate and maintain the equipment necessary to print voter photo identification cards.

County boards of elections shall maintain a secure database containing the photographs of registered voters taken for the purpose of issuing voter photo identification cards.

The State Board shall adopt rules to ensure at a minimum, but not limited to, the following:

A registered voter seeking to obtain a voter photo identification card shall provide the registered voter’s name, the registered voter’s date of birth, and the last four digits of the voter’s social security number.

Voter photo identification cards shall be issued at any time, except during the time period between the end of one-stop voting for a primary or election as provided in

G.S. 163-227.2

and election day for each primary and election.

If the registered voter loses or defaces the voter’s photo identification card, the registered voter may obtain a duplicate card without charge from his or her county board of elections upon request in person, or by telephone or mail.

If a registered voter has a change of name and has updated his or her voter registration to reflect the new name, the registered voter may request and obtain a replacement card from the registered voter’s county board of elections by providing the registered
voter’s date of birth and the last four digits of the registered voter’s social security number in person, by telephone, or by mail.

Voter photo identification cards issued must contain the following disclaimer: “Expiration of this voter photo identification card does not automatically result in the voter’s voter registration becoming inactive.”

Ninety days prior to expiration, the county board of elections shall notify any registered voter issued a voter photographic identification card under this section of the impending expiration of the voter photographic identification card.

History.
2018-144, s. 1.1(a); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a).

§ 163-82.9.
Cancellation of prior registration.

If an applicant indicates on an application form described in

G.S. 163-82.3

a current registration to vote in any other county, municipality, or state, the county board of elections, upon registering the person to vote, shall send a notice to the appropriate officials in the other county, municipality,
or state and shall ask them to cancel the person’s voter registration there. If an applicant completes an application form described in

G.S. 163-82.3

except that the applicant neglects to complete the portion of the form that authorizes cancellation of previous registration in another county, the State Board of Elections shall notify the county board of elections in
the previous county of the new registration, and the board in the previous county shall cancel the registration. The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules to prevent disenfranchisement in the implementation of this section. Those
rules shall include adequate notice to the person whose previous registration is to be cancelled.

History.
1973, c. 793, s. 28; c. 1223, s. 4; 1977, c. 265, s. 3; 1983, c. 411, ss. 1, 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 115; 2005-428, s. 9; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).